Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 23

State Rural Electrification Authority [Repealed]

65-23-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, §§ 1-23; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 3708.25 — 3708.47 (Williams, §§ 3708.26 — 3708.48); Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2301 — 65–2323; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.25 (Williams, § 3708.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2301; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.26(Williams, § 3708.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2302; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.27(Williams, § 3708.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2303; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.34 (Williams, § 3708.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2304; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.35 (Williams, § 3708.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2305; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 12; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.36 (Williams, § 3708.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2306; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.28 (Williams, § 3708.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2307; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.29 (Williams, § 3708.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2308; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.30 (Williams, § 3708.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2309; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.31 (Williams, § 3708.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2310; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.32 (Williams, § 3708.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2311; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.33 (Williams, § 3708.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2312; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.37 (Williams, § 3708.38); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2313; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.38 (Williams, § 3708.39); Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2314; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.40 (Williams, § 3708.41); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2315; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.39 (Williams, § 3708.40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2316; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-117. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.41 (Williams, § 3708.42); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2317; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-118. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.42 (Williams, § 3708.43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2318; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-119. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.43 (Williams, § 3708.44); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2319; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-120. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.44 (Williams, § 3708.45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2320; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-121. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935, (E.S.), ch. 3, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.45 (Williams, § 3708.46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2321; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-122. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.46 (Williams, § 3708.47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2322; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.

65-23-123. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 3, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.47 (Williams, § 3708.48); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2323; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 65-23-101 — 65-23-123, concerned the state rural electrification authority.